Maryland, session 2025, HB0250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FIREARM SAFETY DEVICE” MEANS ANY DEVICE THAT:
(1) WHEN INSTALLED ON A FIREARM, IS DESIGNED TO PREVENT THE
FIREARM FROM BEING OPERATED WITHOUT FIRST DEACTIVATING THE DEVICE; OR
(2) IS A SAFE, GUN SAFE, GUN CASE, LOCK BOX, OR OTHER DEVICE
THAT IS DESIGNED TO BE OR CAN BE USED TO STORE A FIREARM AND THAT IS
DESIGNED TO BE UNLOCKED ONLY BY MEANS OF A KEY, A COMBINATION, OR OTHER
SIMILAR MEANS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0250*

HOUSE BILL 250
(B) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE
INCOME TAX FOR THE AMOUNT PAID BY THE INDIVIDUAL TO PURCHASE A FIREARM
SAFETY DEVICE DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE LESSER
OF:
(I) 100% OF THE PURCHASE PRICE FOR THE FIREARM SAFETY
DEVICE; OR
(II) $200.
(2) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE TAX CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(I) MAY BE CLAIMED ONLY ONCE BY AN INDIVIDUAL; AND
(II) MAY NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT STATED IN THE TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE YEAR
EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, AN INDIVIDUAL MAY
CARRY OVER THE AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS TO THE NEXT TAXABLE YEAR.
(D) TO CLAIM THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL
SHALL APPLY TO THE COMPTROLLER FOR A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE AND ATTACH
TO THE INDIVIDUAL’S INCOME TAX RETURN THE TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO VERIFY THAT AN INDIVIDUAL’S
PURCHASE IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) ISSUE, ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS, A TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE THAT STATES:
1. THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
IS ELIGIBLE FOR; AND
2. THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL MAY
CLAIM THE CREDIT.
(2) (I) THE COMPTROLLER MAY NOT ISSUE AN AGGREGATE
AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES EXCEEDING $250,000 FOR A TAXABLE YEAR.

HOUSE BILL 250 3
(II) IF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PURCHASES A FIREARM SAFETY
DEVICE IN A TAXABLE YEAR DOES NOT RECEIVE A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR
THAT TAXABLE YEAR AS A RESULT OF THE LIMITATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMPTROLLER MAY ISSUE A TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE
TO THAT INDIVIDUAL FOR A SUCCEEDING TAXABLE YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.